Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1003
Rule 1003. Admissibility of duplicate; when.

A duplicate is admissible to the same extent as an original unless (1) a genuine question is raised as to the authenticity of the original or (2) in the circumstances it would be unfair to admit the duplicate in lieu of the original.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 66.

A duplicate writing, as defined by subdivision (4) of section 27-1001, is admissible under this section to the same extent as an original writing without a showing that the original is lost or destroyed or is otherwise unavailable under the circumstances expressed in section 27-1004 regarding a lost or destroyed original. Equitable Life v. Starr, 241 Neb. 609, 489 N.W.2d 857 (1992).

The burden of raising an issue as to the authenticity of the original or the unfairness of the circumstances is on the party opposing admission. State v. Frederiksen, 224 Neb. 653, 400 N.W.2d 225 (1987).

Duplicates of defendant's bank checks were properly admissible where identified by bank official and authenticity of original checks not challenged. State v. Costello, 199 Neb. 43, 256 N.W.2d 97 (1977).